Missouri, session 2026, HB2485.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 261, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 261.181, to read as follows:
261.181. 1. As used in this section, "department" means the department of
agriculture.
2. The department shall establish a controlled livestock grazing program to
provide standards for controlled livestock grazing operations in the clearing of
vegetation from land. The program shall specify at least the following:
(1) The livestock authorized for use in a controlled livestock grazing operation;
(2) A once-per-year limitation on the number of times that controlled livestock
grazing is authorized to be used on a designated plot of land;
(3) A thirty-day limitation on the number of consecutive days in a year that
controlled livestock grazing is authorized to be used on a designated plot of land;
(4) The structures or enclosures authorized for use by a controlled livestock
grazing contractor in a controlled livestock grazing operation;
(5) Containment requirements for livestock used in a controlled livestock
grazing operation;
(6) Permit requirements and fees;
(7) Insurance or bond requirements for a controlled livestock grazing
contractor;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2485 2
(8) The proper care for livestock used in a controlled livestock grazing
operation;
(9) Requirements for regulating noise produced by livestock used in a controlled
livestock grazing operation;
(10) Notice requirements for neighbors or landowners adjacent to land on which
a controlled livestock grazing operation is conducted; and
(11) Any other necessary provision as determined by the department.
3. An individual who desires to conduct a controlled livestock grazing operation
as a controlled livestock grazing contractor shall obtain a permit from the department
for such operation as required under this section.
4. An individual who meets the requirements of the program established under
this section and obtains the required permit may temporarily place structures or
enclosures for livestock used in a controlled livestock grazing operation. No such
temporary structure or enclosure placed for controlled livestock grazing under this
section shall be required to comply with fencing requirements in chapter 272.
5. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Controlled Livestock
Grazing Program Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under this section.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for the
implementation and administration of the controlled livestock grazing program
established in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
6. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
implementation and administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul

HB 2485 3
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔